Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 34
IDAHO TRAFFIC INFRACTIONS ACT

Sec.

§ 49-3401. Definitions. [Repealed.]

§ 49-3402, 49-3403. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-3404, 49-3405. Hearing — Penalty for failure to comply. [Repealed.]

§ 49-3406 — 49-3408. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-3409. Evidence of infraction inadmissible in a civil action. [Repealed.]

§ 49-3410. Disposition of penalties and forfeitures by the courts. [Repealed.]

§ 49-3411. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-3412. Short title. [Repealed.]